Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3908
Exclusive basis.

Sections 30-3907
to 30-3915 provide the exclusive jurisdictional basis for a court of this
state to appoint a guardian or issue a protective order for an adult.

Laws 2011, LB157, § 12.